Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.108

Written plan for consultation, emergency transfer, and transport.

Every licensed midwife shall develop a written plan for consultation with other health care providers, emergency transfer, transport of an infant to a newborn nursery or neonatal intensive care nursery, and transport of an individual to an appropriate obstetrical department or patient care area. The written plan shall be submitted annually together with the license renewal fee to the department.

[ 2022 c 289 s 5; 1981 c 53 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.